Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1112
Defendant, status as a player; affirmative defense, when.

In any prosecution for an offense defined in this article, when the defendant's status as a player constitutes an excusing condition, the fact that the defendant was a player shall constitute an affirmative defense.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 228.